New York, session 2025-2026, A552.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 2 of section 140.15 of the penal law, as 2 amended by chapter 315 of the laws of 2010, is amended and a new subdi- 3 vision 3 is added to read as follows: 4 2. being a person required to maintain registration under article 5 six-C of the correction law and designated a level two or level three 6 offender pursuant to subdivision six of section one hundred 7 sixty-eight-l of the correction law, [he or she] such person enters or 8 remains in a public or private elementary, parochial, intermediate, 9 junior high, vocational or high school knowing that the victim of the 10 offense for which such registration is required attends or formerly 11 attended such school. It shall not be an offense subject to prosecution 12 under this subdivision if: the person is a lawfully registered student 13 at such school; the person is a lawful student participant in a school 14 sponsored event; the person is a parent or a legal guardian of a 15 lawfully registered student at such school and enters the school for the 16 purpose of attending their child's or dependent's event or activity; 17 such school is the person's designated polling place and [he or she] 18 such person enters such school building for the limited purpose of 19 voting; or if the person enters such school building for the limited 20 purposes authorized by the superintendent or chief administrator of such 21 school[.]; or 22 3. such person knowingly enters or remains unlawfully in a transit 23 facility as defined under section twelve hundred of the public authori- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02402-01-5 A. 552 2 1 ties law or a transportation facility as defined under section twelve 2 hundred sixty-one of the public authorities law. 3 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of November next succeed- 4 ing the date on which it shall have become a law.